src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in the Choctaw language are actions

LEXICON V  ! stems, so they don't end in h
  taloowa V-I-II ;
  piNsah  V-I-II ; ! see
  haNklo V-I-II ; ! hear
  hoNwa  V-I-II ; ! smell
  kobaffi V-I-II ; ! break
  akammi  V-I-II ; ! close
  bakaffi V-I-II ; ! split (something) up
  hofaNtichi V-I-II ; ! raise, rear
  honni      V-I-II ; ! boil (something)
  hoppi      V-I-II ; ! bury
  baliili V-Intrans-I ; ! run
  niya    V-Intrans-II ; ! be-fat
  yoppa   V-Intrans-II ; ! be-happy
  ponna   V-Intrans-III ; ! be-skilled

! IRREGULARS: shape aCV
! initial 'a' drops following a prefix

! IRREGULAR: banna = 'want'
! ba- is deleted after a II prefix
! regular form is also allowed
! This only happens in Mississippi Choctaw
